Missouri, session 2026, SB902.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 376, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto
one new section, to be known as section 376.1280, to read as
follows:
376.1280. 1. As used in this section, the following
terms mean:
(1) "Acute pain", pain that results from disease,
accidental or intentional trauma, or other causes, that a
health care provider reasonably expects to last thirty days
or fewer;
(2) "Enrollee", the same meaning given to the term in
section 376.1350;
(3) "Health benefit plan", the same meaning given to
the term in section 376.1350;
(4) "Health care professional", the same meaning given
to the term in section 376.1350.
2. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the
contrary, when a licensed health care professional acting
within the scope of his or her license prescribes a
nonopioid medication for the treatment of acute pain to an
enrollee, it shall be unlawful for a health benefit plan to:

SB 902 2
(1) Deny coverage of the nonopioid prescription drug
in favor of an opioid prescription drug;
(2) Require the enrollee to try an opioid prescription
drug before providing coverage of the nonopioid prescription
drug; or
(3) Require a higher level of cost-sharing for the
nonopioid prescription drug than for an opioid prescription
drug.
3. This section shall apply to health benefit plans
delivered, issued for delivery, continued, or renewed on or
after January 1, 2027.
✓